South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S997.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 56-19-210 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 56-19-210. It shall be unlawful for any person to sell or offer for sale or mortgage in this State any vehicle of a type required to be registered and licensed in this State, or any mobile home, unless a certificate of title has been issued therefor and is currently valid;  but this provision shall not apply to South Carolina dealers in the sale or offering for sale of new vehicles or mobile homes for which there is a manufacturer's certificate of origin made out to the person offering such vehicle or mobile homes for sale, or motor vehicles offered for sale through consignment by a South Carolina motor vehicle dealer. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----